Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.290

Training regarding hate crime offenses.

The criminal justice training commission shall provide training for law enforcement officers in identifying, responding to, and reporting all violations of RCW 9A.36.080 and any other crimes of bigotry or bias.

[ 1993 c 127 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1993 c 127: See note following RCW 9A.36.078.